dictionaries/tr_TR/tr_TR.aff
FLAG num
SFX 35733 N 1
SFX 35733 0 lmiyorsa .

SFX 35734 N 1
SFX 35734 0 ptım .

SFX 35735 N 1
SFX 35735 0 uçlar .

SFX 35736 N 1
SFX 35736 0 binizi .

SFX 35737 N 1
SFX 35737 0 tmeyeceklerini .

SFX 35738 N 1
SFX 35738 0 gandalı .

SFX 35739 N 1
SFX 35739 0 tiklerimizin .

SFX 35740 N 1
SFX 35740 0 ıktadır .

SFX 35741 N 1
SFX 35741 0 ıklıdır .

SFX 35742 N 1
SFX 35742 0 veriyordur .

SFX 35743 N 1
SFX 35743 0 anmamaktadır .

SFX 35744 N 1
SFX 35744 0 yeceklerimiz .

SFX 35745 N 1
SFX 35745 0 tasıymış .

SFX 35746 N 1
SFX 35746 0 ebilmek .

SFX 35747 N 1
SFX 35747 0 nlardansa .

SFX 35748 N 1
SFX 35748 0 receğimiz .

SFX 35749 N 1
SFX 35749 0 acada .

SFX 35750 N 1
SFX 35750 0 laştırmadan .

SFX 35751 N 1
SFX 35751 0 rilirler .

SFX 35752 N 1
SFX 35752 0 nünden .

SFX 35753 N 1
SFX 35753 0 klıyı .

SFX 35754 N 1
SFX 35754 0 çesiyle .

SFX 35755 N 1
SFX 35755 0 letten .

SFX 35756 N 1
SFX 35756 0 rılıyordu .

SFX 35757 N 1
SFX 35757 0 andırdığı .

SFX 35758 N 1
SFX 35758 0 ızdırlar .

SFX 35759 N 1
SFX 35759 0 ebilmeleriyle .

SFX 35760 N 1
SFX 35760 0 endirdiğimiz .

SFX 35761 N 1
SFX 35761 0 zlaşacaktır .

SFX 35762 N 1
SFX 35762 0 iklerinizi .

SFX 35763 N 1
SFX 35763 0 klılara .

SFX 35764 N 1
SFX 35764 0 dırmışlardı .

SFX 35765 N 1
SFX 35765 0 stti .

SFX 35766 N 1
SFX 35766 0 rülmemiz .

SFX 35767 N 1
SFX 35767 0 ediğimizde .

SFX 35768 N 1
SFX 35768 0 etteyiz .

SFX 35769 N 1
SFX 35769 0 rtarak .

SFX 35770 N 1
SFX 35770 0 lazlar .

SFX 35771 N 1
SFX 35771 0 elimi .

SFX 35772 N 1
SFX 35772 0 cında .

SFX 35773 N 1
SFX 35773 0 irsen .

SFX 35774 N 1
SFX 35774 0 pçilik .

SFX 35775 N 1
SFX 35775 0 ndasınızdır .

SFX 35776 N 1
SFX 35776 0 imlik .

SFX 35777 N 1
SFX 35777 0 cıklarla .

SFX 35778 N 1
SFX 35778 0 banları .

SFX 35779 N 1
SFX 35779 0 törünün .

SFX 35780 N 1
SFX 35780 0 iniyormuş .

SFX 35781 N 1
SFX 35781 0 nıkta .

SFX 35782 N 1
SFX 35782 0 rmen .

SFX 35783 N 1
SFX 35783 0 tteyiz .

SFX 35784 N 1
SFX 35784 0 aştırılmıştır .

SFX 35785 N 1
SFX 35785 0 ıklardan .

SFX 35786 N 1
SFX 35786 0 inleştirme .

SFX 35787 N 1
SFX 35787 0 kuyruk .

SFX 35788 N 1
SFX 35788 0 yıverdiği .

SFX 35789 N 1
SFX 35789 0 ilirken .

SFX 35790 N 1
SFX 35790 0 liyorum .

SFX 35791 N 1
SFX 35791 0 ndirilirse .

SFX 35792 N 1
SFX 35792 0 tımla .

SFX 35793 N 1
SFX 35793 0 zlaştırılır .

SFX 35794 N 1
SFX 35794 0 reyken .

SFX 35795 N 1
SFX 35795 0 lelerle .

SFX 35796 N 1
SFX 35796 0 cirleri .

SFX 35797 N 1
SFX 35797 0 kleştim .

SFX 35798 N 1
SFX 35798 0 nilmiyor .

SFX 35799 N 1
SFX 35799 0 lemenizden .

SFX 35800 N 1
SFX 35800 0 şımın .

SFX 35801 N 1
SFX 35801 0 üstü .

SFX 35802 N 1
SFX 35802 0 uğumla .

SFX 35803 N 1
SFX 35803 0 şmekteyim .

SFX 35804 N 1
SFX 35804 0 anamıyordu .

SFX 35805 N 1
SFX 35805 0 emektesin .

SFX 35806 N 1
SFX 35806 0 ığınızdandır .

SFX 35807 N 1
SFX 35807 0 nışında .

SFX 35808 N 1
SFX 35808 0 rmadığınız .

SFX 35809 N 1
SFX 35809 0 sefe .

SFX 35810 N 1
SFX 35810 0 pledim .

SFX 35811 N 1
SFX 35811 0 amalarının .

SFX 35812 N 1
SFX 35812 0 iminin .

SFX 35813 N 1
SFX 35813 0 şlerimin .

SFX 35814 N 1
SFX 35814 0 ıklıklar .

SFX 35815 N 1
SFX 35815 0 üzlükten .

SFX 35816 N 1
SFX 35816 0 ttesiniz .

SFX 35817 N 1
SFX 35817 0 ığım .

SFX 35818 N 1
SFX 35818 0 cilikte .

SFX 35819 N 1
SFX 35819 0 nundayım .

SFX 35820 N 1
SFX 35820 0 allaştırması .

SFX 35821 N 1
SFX 35821 0 amışsanız .

SFX 35822 N 1
SFX 35822 0 ndenler .

SFX 35823 N 1
SFX 35823 0 şamadı .

SFX 35824 N 1
SFX 35824 0 emiyorsunuz .

SFX 35825 N 1
SFX 35825 0 tirmesinden .

SFX 35826 N 1
SFX 35826 0 ansanız .

SFX 35827 N 1
SFX 35827 0 klıktan .

SFX 35828 N 1
SFX 35828 0 eleceğim .

SFX 35829 N 1
SFX 35829 0 lıklarınca .

SFX 35830 N 1
SFX 35830 0 rılabilirse .

SFX 35831 N 1
SFX 35831 0 duruyorlar .

SFX 35832 N 1
SFX 35832 0 laya .

SFX 35833 N 1
SFX 35833 0 aklık .

SFX 35834 N 1
SFX 35834 0 kleridir .

SFX 35835 N 1
SFX 35835 0 rülmemektedir .

SFX 35836 N 1
SFX 35836 0 eneyse .

SFX 35837 N 1
SFX 35837 0 duranlar .

SFX 35838 N 1
SFX 35838 0 rlikti .

SFX 35839 N 1
SFX 35839 0 aştırmışım .

SFX 35840 N 1
SFX 35840 0 ölçerdir .

SFX 35841 N 1
SFX 35841 0 ntusu .

SFX 35842 N 1
SFX 35842 0 ılmamasıdır .

SFX 35843 N 1
SFX 35843 0 erimini .

SFX 35844 N 1
SFX 35844 0 ilirdi .

SFX 35845 N 1
SFX 35845 0 enlerinizin .

SFX 35846 N 1
SFX 35846 0 mayanlarda .

SFX 35847 N 1
SFX 35847 0 derlerse .

SFX 35848 N 1
SFX 35848 0 rindeydiler .

SFX 35849 N 1
SFX 35849 0 enemeyecek .

SFX 35850 N 1
SFX 35850 0 lanmamışsa .

SFX 35851 N 1
SFX 35851 0 nden .

SFX 35852 N 1
SFX 35852 0 urumu .

SFX 35853 N 1
SFX 35853 0 rmiyoruz .

SFX 35854 N 1
SFX 35854 0 inecektir .

SFX 35855 N 1
SFX 35855 0 çlarına .

SFX 35856 N 1
SFX 35856 0 emeyeceklerdir .

SFX 35857 N 1
SFX 35857 0 urulmuş .

SFX 35858 N 1
SFX 35858 0 lerindedir .

SFX 35859 N 1
SFX 35859 0 erindin .

SFX 35860 N 1
SFX 35860 0 ulardadır .

SFX 35861 N 1
SFX 35861 0 rındasınız .

SFX 35862 N 1
SFX 35862 0 nildi .

SFX 35863 N 1
SFX 35863 0 lersin .

SFX 35864 N 1
SFX 35864 0 şilim .

SFX 35865 N 1
SFX 35865 0 ınkilerden .

SFX 35866 N 1
SFX 35866 0 everlik .

SFX 35867 N 1
SFX 35867 0 yonundan .

SFX 35868 N 1
SFX 35868 0 ks .

SFX 35869 N 1
SFX 35869 0 üzdün .

SFX 35870 N 1
SFX 35870 0 msüz .

SFX 35871 N 1
SFX 35871 0 leşmesinde .

SFX 35872 N 1
SFX 35872 0 lli .

SFX 35873 N 1
SFX 35873 0 necek .

SFX 35874 N 1
SFX 35874 0 ulden .

SFX 35875 N 1
SFX 35875 0 dildiğinden .

SFX 35876 N 1
SFX 35876 0 dığımın .

SFX 35877 N 1
SFX 35877 0 rladığı .

SFX 35878 N 1
SFX 35878 0 tırılırmış .

SFX 35879 N 1
SFX 35879 0 çükleri .

SFX 35880 N 1
SFX 35880 0 zlükte .

SFX 35881 N 1
SFX 35881 0 ştırıcıları .

SFX 35882 N 1
SFX 35882 0 ymişsiniz .

SFX 35883 N 1
SFX 35883 0 ramdan .

SFX 35884 N 1
SFX 35884 0 msızdır .

SFX 35885 N 1
SFX 35885 0 ştirilebilmektedir .

SFX 35886 N 1
SFX 35886 0 cağızlarına .

SFX 35887 N 1
SFX 35887 0 dürüyordu .

SFX 35888 N 1
SFX 35888 0 ndakini .

SFX 35889 N 1
SFX 35889 0 yagörsünler .

SFX 35890 N 1
SFX 35890 0 ralarımız .

SFX 35891 N 1
SFX 35891 0 kenleri .

SFX 35892 N 1
SFX 35892 0 ezlerken .

SFX 35893 N 1
SFX 35893 0 aldır .

SFX 35894 N 1
SFX 35894 0 illerine .

SFX 35895 N 1
SFX 35895 0 irmeli .

SFX 35896 N 1
SFX 35896 0 asyonlarıyla .

SFX 35897 N 1
SFX 35897 0 anlığıdır .

SFX 35898 N 1
SFX 35898 0 unduğu .

SFX 35899 N 1
SFX 35899 0 ırların .

SFX 35900 N 1
SFX 35900 0 ılıyorsun .

SFX 35901 N 1
SFX 35901 0 hanelerinde .

SFX 35902 N 1
SFX 35902 0 jımı .

SFX 35903 N 1
SFX 35903 0 diremedikleri .

SFX 35904 N 1
SFX 35904 0 eştirdiği .

SFX 35905 N 1
SFX 35905 0 eşeyim .

SFX 35906 N 1
SFX 35906 0 salcılık .

SFX 35907 N 1
SFX 35907 0 ştirdiğimi .

SFX 35908 N 1
SFX 35908 0 meyecekler .

SFX 35909 N 1
SFX 35909 0 klet .

SFX 35910 N 1
SFX 35910 0 laştıklarına .

SFX 35911 N 1
SFX 35911 0 masınlar .

SFX 35912 N 1
SFX 35912 0 yane .

SFX 35913 N 1
SFX 35913 0 rsini .

SFX 35914 N 1
SFX 35914 0 ndıracağı .

SFX 35915 N 1
SFX 35915 0 şümüzün .

SFX 35916 N 1
SFX 35916 0 ızda .

SFX 35917 N 1
SFX 35917 0 lmeyip .

SFX 35918 N 1
SFX 35918 0 yenimi .

SFX 35919 N 1
SFX 35919 0 şmende .

SFX 35920 N 1
SFX 35920 0 rekti .

SFX 35921 N 1
SFX 35921 0 graflar .

SFX 35922 N 1
SFX 35922 0 tolar .

SFX 35923 N 1
SFX 35923 0 şuşa .

SFX 35924 N 1
SFX 35924 0 ilişinin .

SFX 35925 N 1
SFX 35925 0 ıramadık .

SFX 35926 N 1
SFX 35926 0 acıymış .

SFX 35927 N 1
SFX 35927 0 ucak .

SFX 35928 N 1
SFX 35928 0 andırıldı .

SFX 35929 N 1
SFX 35929 0 tılanmıştır .

SFX 35930 N 1
SFX 35930 0 mediklerimizden .

SFX 35931 N 1
SFX 35931 0 evlerine .

SFX 35932 N 1
SFX 35932 0 lamasanız .

SFX 35933 N 1
SFX 35933 0 lmışın .

SFX 35934 N 1
SFX 35934 0 özünü .

SFX 35935 N 1
SFX 35935 0 üklerdir .

SFX 35936 N 1
SFX 35936 0 binden .

SFX 35937 N 1
SFX 35937 0 sıyız .

SFX 35938 N 1
SFX 35938 0 emeni .

SFX 35939 N 1
SFX 35939 0 kliden .

SFX 35940 N 1
SFX 35940 0 şliğinin .

SFX 35941 N 1
SFX 35941 0 tmasaydın .

SFX 35942 N 1
SFX 35942 0 yarlar .

SFX 35943 N 1
SFX 35943 0 uryanın .

SFX 35944 N 1
SFX 35944 0 lcının .

SFX 35945 N 1
SFX 35945 0 nmalıydı .

SFX 35946 N 1
SFX 35946 0 ştığımızda .

SFX 35947 N 1
SFX 35947 0 yoncusu .

SFX 35948 N 1
SFX 35948 0 ıllarından .

SFX 35949 N 1
SFX 35949 0 ikleştirmiş .

SFX 35950 N 1
SFX 35950 0 yenlerdedir .

SFX 35951 N 1
SFX 35951 0 aşmış .

SFX 35952 N 1
SFX 35952 0 riciliğinin .

SFX 35953 N 1
SFX 35953 0 ındın .

SFX 35954 N 1
SFX 35954 0 eyeceklerimiz .

SFX 35955 N 1
SFX 35955 0 urlarında .

SFX 35956 N 1
SFX 35956 0 nacaklarına .

SFX 35957 N 1
SFX 35957 0 lmalarının .

SFX 35958 N 1
SFX 35958 0 iyetimin .

SFX 35959 N 1
SFX 35959 0 lemece .

SFX 35960 N 1
SFX 35960 0 dirir .

SFX 35961 N 1
SFX 35961 0 zununu .

SFX 35962 N 1
SFX 35962 0 perde .

SFX 35963 N 1
SFX 35963 0 tıldığında .

SFX 35964 N 1
SFX 35964 0 aştırdıkları .

SFX 35965 N 1
SFX 35965 0 larla .

SFX 35966 N 1
SFX 35966 0 dursa .

SFX 35967 N 1
SFX 35967 0 ayanında .

SFX 35968 N 1
SFX 35968 0 miler .

SFX 35969 N 1
SFX 35969 0 tıranlara .

SFX 35970 N 1
SFX 35970 0 yişimizden .

SFX 35971 N 1
SFX 35971 0 tabilmeyi .

SFX 35972 N 1
SFX 35972 0 ceten .

SFX 35973 N 1
SFX 35973 0 şlerimdeki .

SFX 35974 N 1
SFX 35974 0 tırmasınlar .

SFX 35975 N 1
SFX 35975 0 lanacağını .

SFX 35976 N 1
SFX 35976 0 ürlerini .

SFX 35977 N 1
SFX 35977 0 ıklara .

SFX 35978 N 1
SFX 35978 0 tiflerde .

SFX 35979 N 1
SFX 35979 0 tlanacak .

SFX 35980 N 1
SFX 35980 0 nememe .

SFX 35981 N 1
SFX 35981 0 çularla .

SFX 35982 N 1
SFX 35982 0 neceksiniz .

SFX 35983 N 1
SFX 35983 0 tirlermiş .

SFX 35984 N 1
SFX 35984 0 yamamasının .

SFX 35985 N 1
SFX 35985 0 endirdin .

SFX 35986 N 1
SFX 35986 0 verilmek .

SFX 35987 N 1
SFX 35987 0 atlarda .

SFX 35988 N 1
SFX 35988 0 mışsan .

SFX 35989 N 1
SFX 35989 0 tırırsın .

SFX 35990 N 1
SFX 35990 0 ayının .

SFX 35991 N 1
SFX 35991 0 itlerini .

SFX 35992 N 1
SFX 35992 0 şmuş .

SFX 35993 N 1
SFX 35993 0 zdakilerin .

SFX 35994 N 1
SFX 35994 0 rit .

SFX 35995 N 1
SFX 35995 0 ekiydi .

SFX 35996 N 1
SFX 35996 0 emesini .

SFX 35997 N 1
SFX 35997 0 ştirmişti .

SFX 35998 N 1
SFX 35998 0 leyemezsin .

SFX 35999 N 1
SFX 35999 0 anabilen .

SFX 36000 N 1
SFX 36000 0 zıyla .

SFX 36001 N 1
SFX 36001 0 nmedik .

SFX 36002 N 1
SFX 36002 0 ştirdiler .

SFX 36003 N 1
SFX 36003 0 ılabilmesinde .

SFX 36004 N 1
SFX 36004 0 ayım .

SFX 36005 N 1
SFX 36005 0 kardım .

SFX 36006 N 1
SFX 36006 0 ırılacak .

SFX 36007 N 1
SFX 36007 0 riciliğini .

SFX 36008 N 1
SFX 36008 0 casıydı .

SFX 36009 N 1
SFX 36009 0 yanlarla .

SFX 36010 N 1
SFX 36010 0 lamakla .

SFX 36011 N 1
SFX 36011 0 anıncaya .

SFX 36012 N 1
SFX 36012 0 çerlik .

SFX 36013 N 1
SFX 36013 0 atılmasının .

SFX 36014 N 1
SFX 36014 0 madıklarım .

SFX 36015 N 1
SFX 36015 0 ndirilirken .

SFX 36016 N 1
SFX 36016 0 vut .

SFX 36017 N 1
SFX 36017 0 lamıştım .

SFX 36018 N 1
SFX 36018 0 jenlerden .

SFX 36019 N 1
SFX 36019 0 vildir .

SFX 36020 N 1
SFX 36020 0 rlerini .

SFX 36021 N 1
SFX 36021 0 ilebilecekti .

SFX 36022 N 1
SFX 36022 0 uşsam .

SFX 36023 N 1
SFX 36023 0 rıcıları .

SFX 36024 N 1
SFX 36024 0 amalarından .

SFX 36025 N 1
SFX 36025 0 nlerindedir .

SFX 36026 N 1
SFX 36026 0 rasında .

SFX 36027 N 1
SFX 36027 0 tılmayı .

SFX 36028 N 1
SFX 36028 0 mizse .

SFX 36029 N 1
SFX 36029 0 çıklarında .

SFX 36030 N 1
SFX 36030 0 nlarınla .

SFX 36031 N 1
SFX 36031 0 dıklarındaysa .

SFX 36032 N 1
SFX 36032 0 loglara .

SFX 36033 N 1
SFX 36033 0 ilmeni .

SFX 36034 N 1
SFX 36034 0 yorsundur .

SFX 36035 N 1
SFX 36035 0 isim .

SFX 36036 N 1
SFX 36036 0 ülde .

SFX 36037 N 1
SFX 36037 0 nlarımız .

SFX 36038 N 1
SFX 36038 0 cağımla .

SFX 36039 N 1
SFX 36039 0 ılmıştı .

SFX 36040 N 1
SFX 36040 0 ndekinin .

SFX 36041 N 1
SFX 36041 0 diriciyi .

SFX 36042 N 1
SFX 36042 0 lıyor .

SFX 36043 N 1
SFX 36043 0 örlerim .

SFX 36044 N 1
SFX 36044 0 tmalar .

SFX 36045 N 1
SFX 36045 0 eşmesidir .

SFX 36046 N 1
SFX 36046 0 ştırılsın .

SFX 36047 N 1
SFX 36047 0 nınkiyle .

SFX 36048 N 1
SFX 36048 0 ilişlerine .

SFX 36049 N 1
SFX 36049 0 kemalpaşa .
